["1: Monomers and Polymers", "3: Polymer Properties", "1.1: Difunctional Carboxyloids", "1.2: Cyclic Carboxyloids", "1.3: Olefins", "1.4: Cyclic Olefins", "1.5: Coordination Polymers", "1.6: Supramolecular Assemblies", "1.7: Other Polymers", "1.8: Polymer Topology", "1.E: Solutions for Selected Problems", "3.1: Molecular Weight", "3.2: Viscosity", "3.3: Rheology", "3.4: Glass Transition", "3.5: 3.5 Crystallinity in Polymers", "3.6: Microphase Separation", "3.7: Stress-Strain Relationships", "3.8: Storage and Loss Modulus", "3.9: Modulus, Temperature, Time", "3.10: Chapter 3 Solutions", "https://employees.csbsju.edu/cschaller/Advanced/Polymers/Monomerindex.htm", "Thumbnail: Space-filling model of a section of the polyethylene terephthalate polymer, also known as PET and PETE, a polyester used in most plastic bottles. Color code: Carbon, C (black), Hydrogen, H (white), and Oxygen, O (red). Image used with permission (Public Domain; Jynto).", "https://employees.csbsju.edu/cschaller/Advanced/Polymers/PolySynthesis.htm", "The first synthetic polymer to really seize the public's consciousness -- the first one to change the course of world events -- was nylon. Not long after its discovery in the 1930s, it had supplanted silk as the material of choice for stockings, having transformed a luxury item into a widely available commodity. Nylon came just in time for the Second World War. Soon, parachutes, too, went from being made of silk to being fabricated from nylon.", "The development of nylon took place at Du Pont's Experimental Research Station in Delaware. For much of the twentieth century, Du Pont and other large companies relied on the pursuit of basic science as an engine of future development. Knowledge was the infrastructure that made future products possible, and so scientists were asked to explore the unknown; the applications of this work would follow naturally.", "When Wallace Carrothers of Du Pont developed nylon, he had been trying to explore some ideas proposed by Hermann Staudinger at ETH Zurich. These ideas, initially controversial, held that many materials around us, including things like cotton and spider silk, are made of small molecular units covalently bonded to each other. These little molecules, monomers, bind together to form immensely long chains. In so doing, the monomers lose their individual identities and simply become repeating units in a long chain. They come together to form polymers.", "Nylon, in particular, is an example of a polyamide. It is composed of very long chains that contain regularly repeating amide bonds, N-C=O. That's the same motif found in proteins in biology, and it's the same pattern found in spider's silk, which is composed of protein.", "Conceptually, we are taught in biology class that proteins are made of amino acids. An amide bond (or peptide bond) occurs when the nitrogen of an amine is brought together with the carbon of a carboxylic acid. A molecule of water is lost, and the nitrogen takes the place of the oxygen on the carboxylic acid, forming an amide, instead. The loss of water leads to the term \"condensation reaction\" because early studies of these reactions led to water forming droplets on laboratory glassware as it bubbled out of the reaction. In practice, industrial nylon production is really no more complicated than that.", "Of course, not just any old amide can become a protein. What makes amino acids special is the fact that they are difunctional. They contain not just one functional group (an amine, say, or a carboxylic acid), but two. So, when the amine group of an amino acid bonds with the carbonyl of a neighbour, the carboxyl group can bond to the amine of a different neighbour. It's like it has two hands; it can hold onto a friend with each hand, and each of those friends can hold onto another, and so on, forming a chain.", "This functionality is a key part of how polymers can form. Because difunctional molecules can form bonds in two directions, a simple coupling reaction (an amine plus a carboxylic acid making an amide, two small molecules making another small molecule) becomes a polymerization (many small molecules forming an enormous molecule).", "Well, nylon isn't made from an amino acid, although the coupling reaction is similar. Instead, it is made from two different molecules, both of which are difunctional: a diamine and a dicarboxylic acid. The diamine bonds to a neighbouring carbonyl through each end and the dicarboxylic acid bonds to a neighbouring amine through each end. For the most common material, each of the two reactants is six carbons long, giving rise to the term \"nylon 66\".", "Nylon 66 is an example of something called an alternating co-polymer. It isn't just one unit repeating over and over along a chain, but two. The two monomers make the polymer together. We sometimes say that the monomers are enchained when they become part of a polymer. And of course, they have to alternate along the chain, so that one can bind to the complementary other.", "In the drawings above, the dashed lines are meant to suggest continuity: the pattern shown in the drawing keeps repeating to the right and to the left. More commonly, polymers are drawn using parenthetical notation. Below, the part shown in the parentheses is what keeps repeating. If we could make a stamp of that picture, we could construct the polymer chain by simply stamping that image over and over across a sheet of paper.", "Carrothers' development of nylon at Du Pont led indirectly to a very similar polymer that was made in a very different way. Across the Atlantic Ocean, Paul Schlack at IG Farben in Germany was looking for a way to make a similar material that would not be subject to Du Pont's patent. His efforts led to a material called perlon, sometimes referred to as nylon 6.", "Nylon 6 is not an alternating co-polymer like nylon 66. It's just a polymer. And it isn't made from a difunctional monomer like nylon 66 or proteins. Instead, it's made from a cyclic amide, sometimes called a lactam. To polymerize, the lactam has to break open into a linear form, and the lactam monomers end up enchained head-to-tail. This process is called ring-opening polymerization.", "There are a number of things that are different about these two ways of making nylon. One of them turns on the whole concept of synthesis. Synthesis is the act of making things. It's a little like cooking. You gather the ingredients. You take the right amount of this and the right amount of that. You mix them together and you get something wonderful. But that's the difference here: in making nylon 66, Carrothers mixed two different compounds together. He poured one compound out of one bottle and another compound out of another bottle. He mixed them together and he got a polymer.", "In contrast, Schlack didn't mix anything together, at least as far as we have seen so far. It all came out of one bottle. So why wasn't it already nylon 6 in the bottle? If the monomers just react with themselves, couldn't they have just gone ahead and done that in the bottle?", "Ring-opening polymerization, at least in this context, is an example of a chain reaction. Chain reactions don't just happen by themselves; they need a jump start.", "To understand why, you have to appreciate that these two materials come about through two very different classes of polymerization reactions. Nylon 66 is the product of a condensation reaction. An amine is mixed with a carboxylic acid, water is released, and an amide bond is formed. Even if the pair of reactants is chosen to be more synthetically efficient -- say, an amine and an acid chloride instead of a carboxylic acid -- a condensation reaction still results, in this case releasing hydrogen chloride.", "Nylon 6, on the other hand, is not the product of a condensation reaction -- at least at first glance. Look carefully at the monomer and the polymer. Count the atoms. There's nothing missing. No molecule of water or hydrogen chloride or anything else was released. The nitrogen at one end of the chain simply attaches to the carbonyl of the next.", "But if you walk down to the end of that chain, until you reach the very last carbonyl, what do you find there? There's no nitrogen attached. That nitrogen was the nucleophile that bound to the carbonyl in the next monomer. There has to be something, though, because the carbon can't be sitting there with only three bonds. So there must have been some nucleophile that added to that carbonyl, springing loose the amine that added to the next carbonyl, springing the next amine, and so on. There had to be an original nucleophile.", "This is the jump start that the chain reaction needed. A nucleophile had to be added to get things going. Once it reacted with the first monomer, the amine became the nucleophile for the next monomer, and that ring-opening produced another amine nucleophile, and so on. Because there is always a new nucleophile produced when the next ring opens, the reaction just keeps going. That first nucleophile, the one that got everything started, is called an initiator. The need for an initiator is a hallmark of chain reactions.", "In addition to the initiator, ring-opening polymerizations frequently employ catalysts to accelerate the reaction, just as in some condensation polymerizations. The catalyst may be a Lewis acid that activates the carbonyl or an \"organocatalyst\" that does the same thing via hydrogen bonding. Both catalytic approaches can also make use of nucleophilic catalysis. In that case, the nucleophilicity of the nucleophile may be enhanced, or else a temporary nucleophile may add to the carbonyl until it is replaced by the nucleophilic group resulting in enchainment.", "Other polyamides can also be made by ring-opening cyclic amides. The same approach is also used to prepare polyesters from cyclic esters, also called lactones. In that case, the reaction is sometimes called ring-opening trans-esterification polymerization, or ROTEP for short.", "Polyolefins are made from \"olefins\", which you may know as alkenes. Olefin is an older term for an alkene that is still commonly used in the industry.", "These compounds make up a significant fraction of commercially-used polymers today. If you think of the common recyclable plastics, polyethylene (#2 and #4, depending on how the material is made), poly(vinyl chloride) (#3), polypropylene (#5) and polystyrene (#6) are all examples of polyolefins.", "Polyolefins have been known for some time, although it took about a century from the time that they were first documented until they were recognized as polymers. German chemists in the mid-1800s were aware that certain tree resins gave rise to hard materials over time, and these materials included polystyrene.", "If you compare the repeating structure of polystyrene to the structure of styrene, you can imagine that polystyrene is made from a series of styrene molecules that have been strung together. Essentially, the double bond of styrene has moved to attach to the next molecule, and the double bond there has done the same thing, and so on.", "Polyolefins are formed in the same way from a wide variety of alkenes, leading to an array of different materials with properties that are suited to unique applications.", "Note that, like ring-opening polymerization, olefin polymerization depends on molecules reacting with other molecules that are just like them. That isn't likely to happen; they will need something to come along and induce reaction between them. Olefin polymerization is thus another case in which monomers are tied together through a chain reaction. The reaction will require an initiator to get things started. That initiator is likely to become an end group, hanging from one end of the polymer chain or the other.", "Polyolefins are usually made from olefins by tethering one alkene unit to the next, trading in a pi bond within a monomer for a single bond between two repeat units. However, there is another approach that converts cyclic alkenes into polymers. This approach is reminiscent of the ring-opening of cyclic esters and amides.", "For example, imagine a cyclopentene ring opening up at the double bond and reaching out to join with other rings on either side of it.", "A series of cyclopentene rings that joined together in a row would look something like this:", "We would probably draw it in the usual zig-zag conformation.", "This act of taking a cyclic alkene, splitting open its double bond, and knitting it together with other such alkenes in a long chain is called ring-opening metathesis polymerization. Sometimes it is called ROMP for short. It has some things in common with other ring-opening polymerizations, such as ROTEP. In both ROTEP and ROMP, like molecules react together to form a polymer. In ROTEP, it would be two cyclic esters. In ROMP, it would be two cyclic alkenes. That was different from condensation polymerization, which required two complementary molecules, such as a difunctional amine and a difunctional acid chloride.", "Partly as a consequence of like molecules reacting together, ROTEP and ROMP are both chain reactions. In order to get the molecules to react with themselves, they need an initiator. The initiator jump-starts the reaction.", "Other olefin polymerizations followed this pattern as well. Alkenes don't normally react together (there are some circumstances when they will, but we needn't get into that now, as those events don't usually have anything to do with polymerization). Olefin polymerizations, in general, go through chain reactions that require an initiator to get started.", "Despite these similarities, ROTEP and ROMP reactions are actually quite different in how they occur, as are regular olefin polymerizations, and the conditions required to initiate polymerization are unique to each case. ROMP requires something called an olefin metathesis catalyst. An olefin metathesis catalyst is a transition metal compound that is capable of splitting the double bond of an alkene in half and putting the two pieces together with other alkenes. The key part of an olefin metathesis catalyst is a metal-carbon double bond. That is the group that is capable of switching the ends of alkenes around with different partners.", "Polymers are long-chain molecules formed from individual molecular building blocks. Typically, the building blocks are organic molecules held together via covalent bonds. What other kinds of building blocks are available?", "The formation of coordination compounds is one of many important aspects of inorganic chemistry. In a coordination compound, an electron pair donor, called a ligand, shares its electron pair with a metal atom. Frequently, the metal atom is a transition metal, and very commonly it is a transition metal ion, but there are other examples as well.", "For example, the nitrogen in a pyridine ring has a lone pair. Pyridine can act as a ligand if its lone pair is shared with a metal center, such as the vanadium in trichloro(oxo)vanadium. The lone pair becomes a nitrogen-vanadium bond. Sometimes, this bond is drawn as a short arrow from the lone pair to the vanadium, emphasizing its origin, but more often it is simply drawn as a line, like any other bond.", "One of the interesting things about metal atoms is their capacity to form variable numbers of bonds. Although palladium dichloride could form a coordination complex by binding with one pyridine ligand, it can also do so with two pyridines. In the former case, it would form a three-coordinate complex, but the latter case would lead to a four-coordinate palladium compound.", "Remember, the ability to bond with two neighbouring groups, rather than just one, is an important feature that can allow a small molecule to become enchained in a polymer. The palladium here is a link in a chain that is three units long. What if the ligand also had this capacity to bind to two things? What if, instead of pyridine, the ligand were 4,4'-bipyridine?", "That molecule could bind a palladium atom on either end. Once a bpy (that's an abbreviation for bipyridine, pronounced \"bippy\") bound to a palladium atom, it would still have a second nitrogen lone pair that it could use to bind another. The palladium, too, would be free to bind a second bpy. As a result, these two monomeric units are able to form an alternating chain.", "Why would people want to do that? The general idea is to exploit the properties of these metal atoms in new ways. What are metals good at? They are good at conducting electricity, and sometimes they hold useful magnetic properties. If these properties can be incorporated into a material that is more like organic polymers, which tend to be inexpensive and very lightweight, then maybe they can be used to make materials that will have all sorts of applications in everyday life. Metals are also very good catalysts for a wide range of reactions. A coordination polymer serves to space metal atoms out evenly within a structure that has a lot of surface area, which could promote catalytic efficiency. All of these potential uses have driven a great deal of research into coordination polymers in recent years (as well as related \"metal-organic frameworks\").", "Now, can all of the bonds along this metal-ligand chain really hold together to form a polymer? One key difference between the covalent bonds you have seen in organic polymers and the dative bonds here is that dative bonds are reversible. There is always an equilibrium between the metal-ligand complex and the free metal and ligand. Of course, this bond might be very strong, in which case the equilibrium lies toward the metal-ligand complex. In other words, a large fraction of the material would form the metal-ligand complex. How large a fraction? The real value isn't that important at the moment. For our purposes, let's just say we put a metal and a ligand together and 90% of the molecules form a complex. And suppose that's also true in the next step, bringing another ligand into the picture to bind to the metal, and in the step after that, bringing another metal in to bind to the other end of one of the ligands, and so on. So, suppose each of these events leads to 90% product formation.", "Just getting to that four-unit chain relies on three different equilibria. If, as we say, each step proceeds about 90% of the way (which sounds pretty good; you would be happy with a 90% yield on a reaction in the lab), then the entire three-step process would yield 0.90 x 0.90 x 0.90 = 0.73, or 73% product. Not bad. But useful polymer chains might be a thousand units long or more, in which case the amount of polymer actually formed of the proper chain length would be about (0.90)999 = 1.94 x 10-46 or 1.94 x 10-44 %, and that's a ridiculously small amount.", "Now, a real calculation of the equilibrium concentration is of course more sophisticated than that, but this quick exercise underscores an important point: in order to form a stable coordination polymer of an appreciable length, the metal must bind the ligand very tightly. For that reason, many approaches to coordination polymers have employed multidentate ligands, which of course bind more tightly than monodentate ligands. For example, the polymer formed using the bidentate binding shown below would be much more stable with respect to depolymerization (i.e. falling apart into monomers again) than the monodentate example shown earlier.", "So far, we have seen how covalent bonds can be used to bind monomers together into longer chains, forming polymers. There has also been a great deal of interest recently in using intermolecular attractions to make similar structures. Of course, intermolecular attractions are very important in forming large, organized structures in biology. Think about the twin helices held together in DNA, or the secondary and higher-order structures in proteins. Clearly, intermolecular attractions can be used to form large, stable structures.", "If the goal is to form a chain, analogous to the chains of monomers we have seen in other polymers, then it would be useful to have two sites within a monomer that can interact with other monomers. Such a molecule would be able to hold hands with two other partners, so to speak. If we take hydrogen bonding as an example of a strong intermolecular force, then we can look at a molecule such as ethylene glycol (also called 1,2-dihydroxyethane).", "Ethylene glycol looks kind of like ethanol (CH3CH2OH) with an extra OH group. A physical sample of ethylene glycol is a colorless liquid, just like ethanol, but there are noticeable differences between the two. The boiling point of ethylene glycol is around 198\u00b0C, which is over a hundred degrees higher than that of ethanol. Furthermore, ethanol isn't very viscous; it pours quite easily, but if you tried to stir or pour ethylene glycol you would notice that it seems much thicker. Something is holding those ethylene glycol molecules very tightly together. It isn't hard to imagine the formation of chain structures involving groups of these molecules.", "If we look at diols containing longer carbon chains, it's even easier to imagine something that looks kind of like a polymer, with monomers enchained together via hydrogen bonding interactions.", "Hydrogen bonds are strong, but they are still just intermolecular attractions, rather than true covalent bonds. They are readily reversible, so any chains that formed via interaction between these diols could depolymerize very easily. Individual diols could readily fall of the end of the chain, and diol chains could just as easily break somewhere in the middle.", "What about a tetraol? If there were two hydroxy groups at either end of the chain, then the chain would be much less likely to come apart. Even if one hydrogen bond broke at one of the linkages, there would still be a second one holding two neighbors together. A molecule like that could form a much more stable supramolecular assembly.", "The dynamic nature of supramolecular assemblies is part of what makes them so interesting to researchers. Stable structures that can easily form under one set of circumstances, but gently come apart under another, could have lots of applications. For example, some researchers are interested in developing novel materials, such as liquid crystals, that might be converted from one form into another using different stimuli. Others are trying to develop materials that have useful medicinal and therapeutic applications.", "The principle of functionality means that almost any type of organic reaction could potentially be used to make polymers. For instance, if a compound has two functional groups of the same kind, it could undergo reaction at two different sites, forming new bonds with two neighbors. The compound thereby becomes enchained in a trio of formerly independent molecules. If the neighboring molecules are also difunctional, then this pattern can repeat, forming a polymer.", "Take the Diels Alder reaction as an illustrative example. On paper, the reaction is fairly straightforward, even if it isn't all that common. A molecule with a pair of conjugated alkenes, the diene, cyclizes with another alkene, the dienophile, to form a new six-membered ring, a cyclohexene.", "The diene needs two double bonds but the dienophile only needs one. Nevertheless, what happens if the dienophile has an extra double bond? The Diels Alder adduct that forms would end up with two double bonds: one formed from the original diene, as always, and the other leftover from the dienophile.", "The resulting compound is a difunctional alkene. Each end of this molecule could potentially undergo another Diels Alder reaction with an additional diene. Each time that reaction occurs, a new alkene is left behind where the diene used to be, preserving that difunctionality for another step. That difunctionality forms the basis for potential polymer chemistry.", "In fact, Diels Alder reactions have been exploited by researchers in a number of ways to make materials with useful properties. The fact that six-membered rings are introduced along the backbone, rather than a chain of single bonds, means that these materials display varying levels of conformational rigidity, resulting in some unique properties.", "Polymers are very large molecules made from smaller ones. How those smaller units are arranged within the polymer is an issue we haven't addressed very closely yet. Topology is the study of three-dimensional shapes and relationships, or of how individual parts are arranged within a whole. Let's take a look at the topology of polymers.", "At the simplest level, we have been thinking of polymers as chains of monomers strung together like beads on a string. We even use the verb \"enchain\" to describe the act of taking a monomer and tying it into a larger polymer. The chain is the most basic of polymer structures. This topology is often referred to simply as a chain or, to underscore the structure, a linear polymer.", "Even a simple chain, in this context, can have additional structural features worth considering. These features are connected to how a polymer chain grows up from individual monomers. If the polymer results from a chain reaction, typically used for the polymerization of alkenes, then the growing chain usually has two distinct ends. One end, sometimes called the tail, is the site of the first monomer to be incorporated into the polymer, as well as some remnant of the initiator to begin the polymerization process. The other end, sometimes called the head but more commonly just the growing end, is the active site, the place where new monomers are about to be enchained into the polymer.", "That's what happens in most cases when the initiator is capable of reacting with one monomer and starting the chain reaction. However, sometimes initiators are difunctional. Difunctional initiators are capable of getting two monomers to start growing a polymer chain: one in each direction. In that case, the initiator fragment is left behind in the middle of this new growing chain, which grows outward from the middles. Both ends of the chain are growing ends. In this type of growth, the chain is referred to as \"telechelic\".", "Sometimes, polymer chains do not have simple, linear structures. Instead, their chains branch out here and there. This topology is called \"branched\". Instead of looking like a snake or a piece of spaghetti, this structure looks more like a length of seaweed. Branching is sometimes an artifact of how the polymer was made, and so sometimes the same monomers may lead to a more linear polymer or a more branched one. The prime example if polyethylene, which can form high-density polyethylene (HDPE) or low-density polyethylene (LDPE) depending on the conditions under which the ethylene is enchained.", "In a branched polymer, smaller chains grow out like limbs along a tree trunk or leaves along a stem. We can take that arrangement a step further into something that looks more like a net. In what we call a crosslinked structure, branches connect one main chain to the next, tying them together into one big piece. Sometimes, this type of structure is called a thermoset.", "The word \"thermoset\" is really a description of a physical property of a polymer, in contrast to \"thermoplastic\". A thermoplastic is a polymer that can be melted and reformed into new shapes after polymerization. In contrast, once a thermoset has been polymerized, it retains its shape even when heated; it doesn't melt. These terms have connotations about the topology of the material, nonetheless.", "The reason thermoplastics can be melted and formed into new shapes is that they are made of separate molecules. The molecules may be very long, and they may even be branched, but at high enough temperatures these molecules can move completely independently of each other. They can melt and so the material that is comprised of these separate molecules take on new shapes.", "In a thermoset, crosslinks connect the different chains in the material, forming bridges that span from chain to chain to chain, essentially uniting the material into one big molecule. If it is one big molecule, the chains can never move completely independently of each other, and the material can't form a new shape. Looked at in another way, those crosslinks tie the main chains in place. They may be able to move around some, but they can never get very far. If the amount of crosslinking is sufficient, they will always hold the material in the same basic shape.", "Of course, just a little bit of crosslinking may not have the same effect. You may have two or three chains tied together to form one big molecule, but they behave more like highly branched chains than like extended nets.", "It's also worth noting that the term \"crosslink\" can actually mean different things when used in different ways. Sometimes, crosslinks refer to true covalent bonds connecting two chains together. These connections are called \"chemical crosslinks\"; the word chemical refers to the covalent bonds. Alternatively, chains can be connected to each other through strong intermolecular forces. That's not at all the same thing, of course, because these intermolecular forces can be overcome with sufficient energy, and so at some point, the chains may no longer be tied together. These connections are called \"physical crosslinks\" to distinguish them from permanent bonds.", "To use a biology analogy, sulfide bonds in proteins would be an example of chemical crosslinks; they hold the protein firmly in one shape, and a chemical reaction is required to break that connection. The ordinary hydrogen bonds that are so prevalent in the protein are physical crosslinks. Because they can be overcome by adding heat, proteins are very sensitive to temperature.", "Dendrimers are another type of branched structure; the term comes from the Greek dendron or tree. Dendrimers differ from regular branched polymers in that they have a much more regular branching pattern. A dendrimer will actually grow outward from the center, branching out at regular intervals.", "Many dendrimers are polyamides, although there are other types as well. Generally, at least one of the monomers is trifunctional, which introduces the branching in a predictable way.", "As dendrimers grow outward, layer by layer, they are often described in terms of generations. Suppose you start with a trifunctional monomer in the middle. That's generation 0. If the monomer is polymerized outward until there is another set of trifunctional monomers attached on the edge, we have a first generation dendrimer. If we keep going and add another layer of trifunctional monomers, we have a second generation dendrimer, and so on.", "These dendrimers start to look circular on paper, like pancakes, but steric interactions between the groups forces things into three dimensions. As a result, dendrimers are roughly spherical in shape.", "In some of the examples of polymers we have seen, the chain is actually composed of two different monomers. That's true in the case of polyamides such as nylon-6,6. In that example, the chain is composed of difunctional amines alternating with difunctional carboxyloids (such as carboxylic acids or acid chlorides). We can think of a polymer like that as being composed of two different monomers. Of course, because of their complementary reactivity they have to alternate: an amine and then a carboxyloid, to form an amide, and so on. We can think of these polymers as \"co-polymers\", meaning they are formed from more than one kind of monomer. We can go further and say that they are \"alternating co-polymers\" because the two different monomers alternate with each other along the chain.", "In some cases, there is no need for the two different monomers to alternate the way they do in nylon-6,6. If you take a mixture of alkenes that are capable of forming polymers and you polymerize them together, you may well get them randomly enchained into a growing polymer. This arrangement is called a \"random co-polymer\" or sometimes a \"statistical co-polymer\". For example, maybe you manage to get a random sequence of propene and vinyl chloride units along with the polymer.", "Notice that in the above example we still have the same zig-zag main chain in the polymer; all that changes between one monomer and the other is the group attached to that main chain. It is sometimes useful to think about this main chain or \"backbone\" separately from the attached or \"pendant groups\". In this case, we have what looks like a polyethylene backbone with pendant chlorides or methyls randomly attached.", "A random arrangement isn't the only possibility. Maybe all of the vinyl chlorides polymerized in a row, and then all of the propenes were incorporated after them. The result would be a diblock co-polymer; there is a solid block of poly(vinyl chloride) at one end of the chain and a solid block of polypropylene at the other end.", "There are a couple of ways that could happen. Maybe you waited until all of the vinyl chlorides were enchained before adding any propene so that all of the vinyl chlorides were enchained at the tail end and the propenes were added at the growing end later. Alternatively, maybe you added them all at once but the vinyl chlorides just underwent polymerization a whole lot faster than the propenes; the vinyl chlorides all became enchained before the propenes had a chance.", "Those possibilities assume that the monomers are all enchained linearly. There are other possibilities. Maybe one set of monomers form the polymer backbone and the other set form pendant branches along the chain. That arrangement is called a \"graft co-polymer\", as though we have little apple trees grafted onto the trunk of another breed.", "Problem MP1.1.", "Problem MP1.2.", "Problem MP1.3.", "Problem MP2.1.", "Problem MP2.2.", "Problem MP2.3.", "Problem MP3.1.", "Problem MP3.2.", "Problem MP4.1.", "Problem MP4.2.", "Problem MP4.3.", "Problem MP5.1.", "Problem MP5.2.", "Problem MP5.3.", "Problem MP6.1.", "Problem MP7.1.", "Problem MP7.2.", "Molecular weight is one of the most central aspects of polymer properties. Of course, all molecules have molecular weights of their own. It might seem obvious that molecular weight is an essential property of any molecular compound. In polymers, molecular weight takes on added significance. That's because a polymer is a large molecule made up of repeating units, but how many repeating units? Thirty? A thousand? A million? Any of those possibilities might still be considered a representative of the same material, but their molecular weights would be very different, and so would their properties.", "That variation introduces some unique aspects of polymer molecular weight. Because polymers are assembled from smaller molecules, the length (and consequently the molecular weight) of a polymer chain depends on the number of monomers that have been enchained into the polymer. The number of enchained monomers in an average polymer chain in a material is called the degree of polymerization (DP).", "Notice that key point: it is just an average. In any given material, there will be some chains that have added more monomers and some chains that have added fewer. Why the difference? First of all, polymer growth is a dynamic process. It requires monomers to come together and react. What if one monomer starts reacting, forming a growing chain, before any of the others get started? With its head start, this chain will become longer than the rest. What if something goes wrong with one of the growing chains, and it can no longer add new monomers? That chain experienced an early death, and it will never grow as long as the others.", "As a result, when we are speaking about the molecular weight of a polymer, we are always talking about an average value. Some chains in the material will be longer (and heavier) and some chains in the material will be shorter (and lighter). As with any group of measurements, it's helpful to know how widely distributed the individual values really are. In polymer chemistry, the width of the distribution of molecular weights is described by the dispersity (\u00d0, also called, in older texts, the polydispersity or the polydispersity index, PDI). The dispersity of a polymer sample if often between 1 and 2 (although it can be even higher than 2). The closer it is to 1, the narrower the distribution. That is, a dispersity of 1.0 would mean that all of the chains in a sample are exactly the same length, with the same molecular weight.", "The original idea of dispersity was based on alternative methods of measuring the molecular weight (or the chain length) of a polymer sample. One set of methods gave something called the number average molecular weight (symbol Mn). These methods essentially took the weight of a sample, counted the molecules in a sample, and therefore found the average weight of each molecule in that sample. A classic example of this approach is a colligative properties experiment, such as a freezing point depression. You know that impurities in a liquid tend to disrupt intermolecular interactions and lower the freezing point of the liquid. You may also know that the amount by which the freezing gets lowered depends on the number of molecules or ions that get dissolved. Hence, if you weigh a sample of polymer, dissolve it in a solvent, and measure the freezing point, you could figure out the number of molecules dissolved and consequently arrive at Mn.", "That's not so easy in practice; freezing point depressions are very small. They're not used very often anymore. A very common example of the kind of measurement widely used to determine Mn today is end group analysis. In end group analysis, we use 1H NMR measurements to determine the ratio of a specific proton in the repeat units to a specific proton in the end group. Remember, the end group might be something like the initiator, which only added onto the first monomer to get the polymerization going. By the end of the polymerization, it is still found at the end of the polymer chain, so it is an end group. There is only one of them per chain, whereas there are lots of monomers enchained in the polymer, so the ratio of those enchained monomers to the end group tells us how long the chain is.", "The other set of methods upon which dispersity was based gave something called the weight average molecular weight (symbol Mw). The classic example was a light-scattering experiment. In this experiment, a solution of polymer was exposed to a beam of light and the resulting scattered light -- coming from the sample in different directions -- was analyzed to determine the size of the polymer chains in the solution. The results were more heavily influenced by the larger molecules in solution. As a result, this measurement of molecular weight was always higher than measurements based on counting every single molecule.", "The resulting ratio, \u00d0 = Mw / Mn, became known as the polydispersity index or, more recently, the dispersity. Because Mw was always more strongly influenced by longer chains, it was a little bigger than Mn and therefore the dispersity was always bigger than 1.0.", "Nowadays, both molecular weight and dispersity are most commonly measured using gel permeation chromatography (GPC), synonymous with size-exclusion chromatography (SEC). This method is a high-performance liquid chromatography (HPLC) technique. Solvent containing a sample of polymer is pumped through a specialized chromatography column capable of separating molecules based on their size differences. As sample emerges from the column, it is detected and recorded. Most commonly, the presence of sample in the solvent emerging from the column causes a slight change in the refractive index. A graph of refractive index versus time presents a record of the amount of sample emerging from the column at a given time. Because the column separated molecules based on size, the time axis corresponds indirectly with chain length of molecular weight.", "How can the column separate molecules based on size? The column is packed with a porous material, usually insoluble polymer beads. The pore sizes vary. These pores a crucial to separation because molecules flowing through the column may tarry in the pores. Smaller molecules could become delayed in any of the pores in the material, whereas larger molecules will only be delayed in the very largest pores. Consequently, a longer elution time corresponds to a lower molecular weight.", "If you injected a series of different polymers into a GPC, each having a different molecular weight distribution, you would observe each one eluting at a different time. What's more, each peak may be broader or narrower, depending on the dispersity of that particular sample.", "The wider the peak in GPC, the broader the distribution of molecular weights; the narrower the peaks, the more uniform are the chains. Normally a software package analyzes the curve to determine the dispersity.", "Note that the x axis on a GPC trace is most commonly labeled as \"elution time\" and it normally runs left to right. However, often the x axis is labeled \"molecular wright\" because that is really the quantity we are interested in. In fact, sometimes the axis is reversed, so that peaks with higher molecular weights appear to the right, because it can feel more natural to look at it that way. You need to look carefully at the data to see how it is displayed.", "There are some problems with relying on GPC for molecular weight measurements. The main difficulty is that polymers in solution tend to coil into balls, and those coils will contain greater or lesser amounts of solvent, depending on how strongly the polymer and solvent interact with each other. If it interacts more strongly with the solvent, it will pull lots more solvent molecules inside its coils. The coil has to get bigger to make room for those internal solvent molecules. If it doesn't interact strongly with the solvent, it will mostly just stick to itself, blocking the solvent molecules out. There is a broad range of behaviors in between.", "As a result, different polymers may swell to different extents in different solvents. That matters because GPC is really using size of the polymer coil as an index of its molecular weight, so comparing GPC traces of two different kinds of polymers has to be done with caution.", "Problem CP1.1.", "In each of the following cases, state which polymer has the higher molecular weight, and which one has a narrower dispersity", "Problem CP1.2.", "Calculate the molecular weight of the following samples.", "Problem CP1.3.", "Use NMR end group analysis to determine the degrees of polymerization in the following samples.", "Polymers have come to occupy a very important niche in the materials we use every day. What makes them unique? Why do they have properties that aren't easily replicated by other materials?", "Let's start with a property that you are probably familiar with. Viscosity is a term we use to describe the \"thickness\" of different liquids. For example, we say that honey is more viscous than water. Motor oil is more viscous than gasoline. When we say that, we mean that water is much easier to stir or to pour than honey. The honey moves more slowly. It resists the movement of the spoon when we stir it. Viscosity is often described in very general terms as \"resistance to flow\". The honey doesn't flow very easily, especially compared to something like water.", "Now, honey isn't a polymer. It's a very concentrated solution. It contains a little bit of water and a whole lot of sugars, plus other small molecules produced by the plants from which the bees gathered the nectar to make the honey. The sugars aren't polymers, either; they are simple monosaccharides such as glucose and fructose. Nevertheless, this high viscosity is something honey has in common with polymer solutions, as well as with some oligomers, which are short-chain polymers that can be liquids instead of solids.", "Why is honey so viscous? Partly it's just that the sugar molecules in the water are much larger than the water molecules, so they experience a lot more drag as they move through the solution compared to just plain water.", "The strong intermolecular attractions between the individual sugar molecules are also a major factor. Sugars are covered in OH or hydroxyl groups that are capable of strong hydrogen bonds. As these molecules move past each other in the very concentrated solution, they cling to each other, slowing down the flow of the liquid.", "The motor oil example works in a similar way. Motor oil and gasoline are composed of the same class of compounds, hydrocarbons, composed of carbon chains covered in hydrogen atoms. They're very similar to each other. The intermolecular attractions between the molecules are much weaker than those between sugar molecules; they're just London dispersion forces. The major difference between motor oil and gasoline is that the motor oil contains much longer hydrocarbon chains. The molecules are bigger, and so they experience more drag as they move through the liquid. The amount of intermolecular interactions is also crucial in determining how tightly two molecules hold onto each other, and this factor is especially important in very weak London dispersion forces, where a small advantage goes a long way. Those longer hydrocarbon chains in the motor oil cling to each other much more strongly than the shorter ones in the gasoline, so gasoline flows much more easily than motor oil.", "For similar reasons, oligomers and polymers, if they are liquids, also display high viscosity. The extended contact between their long molecular chains leads to enhanced intermolecular attractions that contribute to a resistance to flow. Increased drag is also a factor; even in solution, these very large molecules encounter more resistance as they move past solvent molecules compared to the resistance smaller molecules would experience.", "In fact, viscosity measurements of polymer solutions are another way to determine the size of the polymer -- leading to the chain length and the molecular weight. The larger the polymer, the more drag and also the more intermolecular attraction, and so the higher the viscosity.", "So, the viscosity increases with the molecular weight, but not necessarily in a linear way. That can make it more difficult to use a graph like this to predict molecular weight from a viscosity measurement. One common thing to do in this situation is to take the log of the values. That approach will often give a straight line when two things are related.", "Often in nature one physical property that depends on another will follow a \"power law\". That means that one quantity depends on the other raised to some exponent. In this case, the relationship is described by the Mark-Houwink equation:", "[\u03b7]=K\nM\n\u03b1\n(3.2.1)\n(3.2.1)[\u03b7]=KM\u03b1", "In this equation, [\u03b7] is the intrinsic viscosity; that's the viscosity attributed to the solute, rather than the viscosity of the solvent itself. M is the molecular weight. K and \u03b1 are constants for a particular polymer.", "If you take the log of both sides of the equation -- that's OK to do mathematically, just like you could multiply both sides of an equation by four or subtract three from both sides and still have an equivalent expression -- you get:", "log[\u03b7]=log(K\nM\na\n)\n(3.2.2)\n(3.2.2)log\u2061[\u03b7]=log(KMa)", "If you take the log of two things multiplied together, it's the same as adding the individual logs of both things.", "log[\u03b7]=logK+log(\nM\na\n)\n(3.2.3)\n(3.2.3)log\u2061[\u03b7]=log\u2061K+log\u2061(Ma)", "And if you take the log of something raised to an exponent, the exponent just comes down to become a coefficient.", "log[\u03b7]=logK+\u03b1logM\n(3.2.4)\n(3.2.4)log\u2061[\u03b7]=log\u2061K+\u03b1log\u2061M", "or", "log[\u03b7]=\u03b1\\logM+logK\n(3.2.5)\n(3.2.5)log\u2061[\u03b7]=\u03b1\\logM+log\u2061K", "That looks like an equation for a straight line: y = mx + b. Here, you plot log[\u03b7] on the y axis, logM on the x axis, and you get a straight line with those constants, \u03b1 and K, as the slope and y-intercept, respectively.", "This approach does not yield an absolute measurement. You couldn't take two completely different polymers, take viscosity measurements, and make conclusions about which one had a higher average molecular weight. However, if you took a series of polymers of the same kind and measured their viscosities in solution, you would be able to deduce which ones were longer and which ones were shorter.", "In fact, the dependence of viscosity on the molecular weight of polymers is more complicated than this graph suggests. If you deal with large enough polymers, the graph starts to look like this one:", "Why does it bend? Remember, polymers in solution are coiled up into balls. A longer chain just corresponds to a bigger coil. At some point, these chains become big enough that they aren't likely to stay coiled independently of each other. They become more and more likely to interact with each other. They become entangled with each other.", "There are plenty of other factors you would have to take into account in using viscosity to assess molecular weight. One of them is concentration, for example. The more concentrated a polymer solution, the more large molecules you have exerting drag and interacting with each other. Higher concentration leads to a higher viscosity measurement. Consequently, you would have to make sure you accounted for the polymer concentrations if you used this method.", "Problem PP2.1.", "Estimate the values of \u03b1 and K for the polymer that provided the plot below.", "Problem PP2.2.", "Suppose you have a polymer described by the plot below. If your sample has a molecular weight of 1 million g/mol, what would you expect for intrinsic viscosity under the conditions of this experiment?", "Problem PP2.3.", "Suppose you have a calibration plot, below, for a particular polymer. If you measure the intrinsic viscosity of a sample and find that the value is 800 ml / g, what is the molecular weight of the sample?", "Problem PP2.4.", "Ethanol (CH3CH2OH) has an \"absolute viscosity\" of 1.095 centipoise, whereas ethylene glycol (HOCH2CH2OH) has an absolute viscosity of 16.2 centipoise. Explain why the two values are so different.", "Viscosity measurements are the realm of a field of science called rheology. Rheology is, literally, the study of flow. Another very simple definition, attributed to chemical engineer Chris Macosko at University of Minnesota, is the study of \"what happens when you squish stuff\". There's an element of force or pressure that comes into play here, too.", "One of the common ways of assessing properties in rheology is to place a sample between two parallel plates and move one plate with respect to the other. One plate says still and the other one moves. What happens to the liquid between the plates? There ought to be some friction between the stationary plate and the liquid that will keep the liquid still. There also ought to be some friction between the moving plate and the liquid that will make the liquid move along at the same speed as that plate. So at one extreme, the liquid is moving along with the sliding plate and at the other extreme the liquid is perfectly still. If we imagine that the liquid in between these two extremes is divided into very thin layers, then each layer must be moving at a slightly different speed than the next.", "In the diagram, the symbol, u, stands for the speed of the layer of liquid. The arrow beside the layer is meant to convey its relative speed: the top layer is moving the fastest, the next layer is a little slower, and so on; the bottom layer isn't moving at all. There is an important quantity, called the strain rate or shear rate (given as a symbol the Greek letter gamma, \u03b3, with a dot on top) that describes how the speed of the liquid moving along the x-axis (left to right) changes, layer by layer, in the y-direction.", "What does this picture have to do with viscosity? Well, in order to get that top plate to move, we have to apply some sort of force to it. In rheology the force is given per unit area (like pressure); this force per unit area is described as the stress (given as a symbol the Greek letter sigma, \u03c3).", "What if we wanted to slide the plate even faster? What would happen to the liquid? Well, the shear rate would go up. The top layer would be moving even faster, and the bottom layer would still be stationary. And what would we have to do to get that faster shear rate? We would have to push the top plate a little harder. The result is a graph that looks like this:", "The graph says that shear stress and shear rate are directly related. The stress is called \"shear stress\" because of the direction of the force parallel to the liquid, causing shear strain. When we increase the shear rate, the shear stress also increases proportionally. So, if we did this experiment using water as the liquid between the plates, we would get a linear relationship between shear stress and shear rate. That's how Sir Isaac Newton described the behavior of liquids, so when we see that linear relationship between stress and strain, we describe the liquid as a Newtonian liquid.", "What happens if we do the experiment with honey instead of water? What would happen, for example, if we exerted a certain stress to get a certain shear rate with the water, and we wanted to get the same shear rate using honey? Well, the honey is thicker than the water. It's not going to move as easily. We will have to apply a greater stress in order to achieve the same shear rate that we measured with water.", "That would be true for every possible shear rate. If we were to graph shear stress vs. shear strain with honey, we would get a linear relationship, just like we did with water, but the value of shear stress would always be higher than for water. The slope of the line for honey would be greater than the slope of the line for water.", "Viscosity is formally defined as the slope of that line. Honey, being thicker than water, requires higher and higher stresses to achieve the same strain rates that you would get using lower stresses with water. In the simple kitchen analog of the experiment, you have to push the spoon harder to stir the honey than you do if you are just stirring water.", "Honey and water are Newtonian liquids. The relationship is simple: increase the shear stress and you increase the shear rate. Not all liquids behave that way. Polymer solutions don't, for example. They display a non-linear relationship, in which the shear stresses needed to get higher shear rates are just not as high as you would expect.", "That behavior is described as shear thinning. What makes polymer solutions do that? Remember that, in solution, an individual polymer molecule tends to coil up into a ball. Normally, those balls are spherical. At high shear rates, they distort into ellipses. That reduces the amount of drag, making the solution a little less viscous than you would expect. The shear stress still increases with higher shear rates, but not as much as if it were a Newtonian fluid.", "That's not all. Remember, polymers display chain entanglement, especially when they are very large. Chain entanglement increases the viscosity of the solution. These chains are mobile because the polymer is constantly undergoing conformational changes. As the solution gets sheared, some of the polymer chains may wiggle loose from their neighbors, but random conformational changes will always result in new entanglements right away.", "But what happens at a very high rate of shear strain? The polymer chains still become untangled, but they don't have time to form new entanglements, because everything is whizzing by too quickly. Without those entanglements, viscosity doesn't increase as sharply as you would expect.", "Some liquids behave just like water, but polymer solutions do not. That's a consequence of the enormously long chain structures of the polymers. It's worth pointing out that there are other things that don't behave in the \"normal\" way. Colloids often display shear thickening. You can see examples of this in videos of people running across wading pools filled with corn starch and water, a colloidal mixture in which the solid cornstarch particles are just suspended in the water, not dissolved. If you walk across the pool, you sink. If you run, you stay on top. That's shear thickening, and it has to do with how those solid particles move during shearing. When you walk, they just slide past each other, but when you run, they all collide, and come to a stop.", "A Bingham plastic, on the other hand, actually appears to be a solid until you give it a good shove; then it flows like a liquid. Peanut butter behaves sort of like that.", "Problem PP3.1.", "Honey is a Newtonian fluid, but molasses undergoes shear thinning. What might you deduce about the composition of molasses and honey?", "The glass transition is probably the most commonly-cited characteristic of a polymeric material. At the glass transition temperature, the physical nature of the material changes subtly. It goes from being a rubbery, flexible material at higher temperature, above the glass transition, to a glassy, harder material at a lower temperature. The material is still a solid either way, but there is a definite change in how it responds to stimuli.", "A material could certainly be useful in either state. We might want a plastic to be more rigid, like a water bottle or a rod for a shower curtain. Alternatively, we might want it to be softer, like a seat cushion. Either way, it might be helpful to know the temperature at which the material will change from one type to the other.", "The glass transition is a little like what happens to gummy bears when you put them in ice cream. Straight from the bag, gummy bears are chewy, but they don't feel like they will break your teeth. Put them on ice cream and that changes. They become much harder to chew.", "The classic explanation for the glass transition is based on the idea of chain flow. Polymers are long-chain molecules and, given a little energy, the chains move around. They wiggle. They undergo bond rotations, switching from one conformation to another. A block of material contains piles of chains, like a nest of snakes. Chain ends and loops squirm past each other continuously.", "Chain flow allows a material to adapt when forces are exerted on it. We can bend an eraser because the chains in the rubber slide over each other and adopt a new shape. At least, that's what happens at room temperature. It might not work if the eraser were accidentally dropped in some liquid nitrogen, which is very, very cold.", "As a block of material cools down, it contracts. The molecules become packed more closely together. At some point, the free volume -- that's the amount of volume in the material that is not actually taken up by the molecules -- becomes too small to allow chains to move past each other. All of those chains need a little room around them if they are going to undergo conformational changes, and conformational changes are how polymer chains move. Without that extra room, the material suddenly becomes less flexible.", "If we start in the glassy state and increase the temperature, the volume of the material is expanding, and the free volume is increasing, too. At some point, the free volume becomes great enough that chains can slip past each other. The material becomes more flexible. It becomes rubbery.", "Now, this transition is not the same thing as melting. The chains are not completely overcoming their interactions with each other and gaining freedom of movement in any direction. The chains are still highly entangled. Portions of the chain are sliding past each other but overall things have not changed that drastically. The block of polymer does not turn into a gooey puddle of liquid.", "Well, if a material can change from glassy to rubbery at a certain temperature, there will be consequences in how the material behaves. For example, the tires on your car are meant to be rubbery and flexible; that factor helps them grip the road. If the weather gets too cold and your tires become glassy, the tires no longer have the same amount of flexibility, and you don't have as much traction. \"All-weather tires\" are composed of a rubber that has a very low glass transition temperature, helping to avoid this problem. (\"Snow tires\" are a different thing; they have patterns in the treads that help channel away the snow in order to improve traction.) Knowing when this change will occur would be very useful. So, how do we determine the glass transition?", "Phase changes, such as melting points, are measured using calorimetry, so let's start there. When a solid is heated, its temperature increases. That seems simple enough. Temperature is basically a measure of heat content, so as heat flows in, the measured temperature rises. This simple relationship breaks down at the melting point. At that point, heat flowing into the material is consumed by the breaking of intermolecular forces. Overcoming these attractions costs extra energy. Consequently, there is a point at which the temperature rise in the material stalls out temporarily while it melts.", "This extra heat needed to melt the material is called the heat of melting or, more commonly, the heat of fusion. Heat of fusion actually refers to the opposite process as the material is cooled and frozen. As heat is carried away from a cooling material, it cools down gradually, but there comes a point at which those strong intermolecular interactions form, giving off some extra heat. The fusion temperature is the same as the melting temperature, and the heat of fusion is the same as the heat of melting, but in one case the heat is added and in another case the heat is given off. In principle, if we just heat something up and look for that stalling point in the temperature, we can find the temperature of the phase transition.", "Differential scanning calorimetry (DSC) is a technique that is commonly used to measure phase transitions, including the glass transition temperature. It is based on the same ideas but the experiment is run in a slightly different way. In DSC, we have two tiny sample chambers side by side. One contains the material we are interested in and the other (empty) one is used as a reference. The instrument heats both samples at a constant rate, all the while maintaining both of them at the same temperature. Consequently, it may actually add more heat to one chamber than the other, so that they both reach 30.5 \u00b0C at the same time, then 30.6 \u00b0C, and so on. Once we reach the melting point of the sample of interest, heat flow into that sample must be increased so that it can keep up with the reference. Past that point, the heat flow drops back to a more normal level.", "If we look at a DSC scan, we see a graph of heat flow on the y-axis and temperature on the x-axis. The heat flow usually stays pretty constant as the temperature increases. At the melting point, heat flow increases, but then it drops back down once the melting point has been overcome. It may not drop back to the same level as before, however, because the heat flow that is recorded is related to the heat capacity of the material. The solid and the liquid usually respond differently to heat. In general, because the molecules in a liquid can freely rotate, they have something else to do with added heat. Liquids thus have a slightly higher heat capacity than their corresponding solids.", "All of that explanation hopefully prepares us for a DSC study of the glass transition temperature. It works the same way, but only up to a point. If we look at a DSC scan, we still see heat flow on the y-axis and temperature on the x-axis. At the glass transition, heat flow bumps up slightly -- and remains there. It looks very different from a melting point. A DSC scan of a melting point shows a \"peak\" at the transition temperature. A DSC scan of a glass transition point shows only a little step, like a riverbank", "Why is it different? Well, the glass transition is not really a phase change like the melting point or boiling point. It does not involve a physical change of state. It was a solid before and it is a solid afterward. No intermolecular interactions must suddenly be overcome to free the molecules from each other. Instead, it's just a volume change. The free volume became great enough that the chains can slip past each other, but the chains are still clinging together in a solid-state. Now, that additional movement does have consequences. The material becomes more flexible. If heat flows in, there is more freedom of motion into which the heat can be distributed. In other words, there is a slight increase in heat capacity, and that's what we observe in DSC.", "One practical note: DSC scans can actually be displayed in two different ways. The y-axis can either display heat flowing in or heat flowing out. That means melting points can look like peaks or like valleys, depending on how the data is displayed. Often the data are labeled with an arrow that says \"endo\" to tell you which direction along the y-axis means more heat is flowing in (or possibly \"exo\", meaning which direction means heat is flowing out). You need to look carefully if things seem backward.", "Problem CP4.1.", "For each DSC trace, state what sort of transition os occurring at what temperature.", "Why does the glass transition temperature vary from one kind of polymer to another? What structural factors influence the glass transition temperature? This structure-property relationship isn't a straightforward one, as there seem to be a number of different variables involved. However, the simplest of these factors is just molecular weight. The higher the molecular weight of a polymer, the higher its glass transition temperature. This relationship is true only up to a certain point, however. The non-linear dependence of the glass transition temperature of molecular weight is described by the Flory-Fox equation:", "Tg = Tg(\u221e) - K / Mn", "Here, Tg(\u221e) refers to the glass transition temperature of an infinitely long chain of the polymer. K is a constant for a particular polymer, such as polystyrene or polyethylene.", "A plot of Tg vs. Mn resembles a saturation curve; the line rises sharply, gradually stalling out and continuing parallel to the x-axis. In other words, although this relationship of increasing glass transition temperature with increasing molecular weight holds true at relatively low molecular weights, the glass transition temperature remains constant once a threshold molecular weight has been reached.", "We often think of polymers in the form of plastics: solid materials that serve some structural function, like a water bottle or some Venetian blinds. Polymers are different from many other such solids. Metals, for instance, have crystalline structures, in which atoms form a regularly repeating pattern, row upon row. Polymers, in contrast, are generally somewhat amorphous. Think of a strainer filled with cooked spaghetti, the long chains of pasta looping over each other randomly. That's how the molecules of amorphous or \"shapeless\" polymers tend to distribute themselves.", "Polymers are capable of forming more ordered structures. If they aligned instead with their long chains parallel to each other, they would be able to get much closer together, and intermolecular attractions between the chains would be much stronger. The energy of the system would decrease, so this more crystalline structure should be inherently favored.", "So why doesn't that always happen? Think about a polymer cooling from a completely melted state, in which case the structure is certainly amorphous. As it cools, the material becomes less like a liquid, and then less soft. With small molecules, that transition is relatively abrupt, as the molecules slide into place, guided by their strengthening intermolecular attractions. The molecules just have to rotate a little to face the correct direction, or maybe budge a little to the side. With polymers, the transition is much more gradual, because those great, long chains have to slide over each other and uncoil in order to lie parallel. At some point, there just isn't enough energy for them to keep working their way into the optimal alignment. As a result, many polymers are semi-crystalline, with regions called lamellae where portions of chains have aligned parallel to each other, but also with large amorphous areas that are much more randomly oriented.", "As a result, a polymer sample might be 80% amorphous with only 20% of its chain lengths aligned in crystalline lamellae. Even so, those crystalline domains exert a strong influence on the properties of the polymer. Because of the stronger intermolecular attractions between these closer chains, the chains are much less able to slide past each other. The result is a material that is stronger and more rigid, and that can be very important for reliable structural materials.", "How do we know whether a polymer sample contains crystalline domains? We can use differential scanning calorimetry to observe the transition between an ordered crystalline phase and a disordered melt phase with added heat. As we saw when we were looking at glass transition, a melting point shows up as a peak on a DSC trace. You can look for it at a temperature above Tg, which you will recall looks more like a step in the baseline. Below Tg, the chains are not mobile enough to move out of alignment with each other. In the example below, you can see Tg at about 128 \u00b0C as well as a melting point, Tm, when attractions between chains in the lamellae are overcome, at 155-160 \u00b0C.", "If this were a regular molecular or elemental solid, the melting point would be the same as the fusion point; the material would melt at the same temperature during warming as it froze during cooling. In polymers, it usually doesn't work out that way, and a hysteresis is observed. In hysteresis, a sample has changed because of previous events, leading to results that don't seem to be reproducible in the way that we would normally expect. In general, the crystallization temperature, Tc, is lower than the melting temperature, Tm. That's because, as the material melts, the chains move out of alignment with each other and, because of chain entanglement, they are hindered from getting back into alignment with each other again, leading to a delay in crystallization.", "EXAMPLE\n3.5.1\n3.5.", "Describe what is observed in each of the following DSC traces.", "Crystallinity can also be probed in other ways. The classic approach is through X-ray diffraction. When X-rays pass through ordered materials, they give rise to diffraction patterns, bright spots in space where ricocheting X-rays have constructively interfered with each other, shining starkly amid the blackness where the X-rays have undergone destructive interference.", "The drawing below is a cartoon of an X-ray diffraction pattern. It might be captured by a digital camera or, in earlier days, a sheet of photographic film. The bright spots result from X-rays scattering out from the middle, where they have encountered the sample. In the middle, the black circle blocks the original X-ray beam, which would otherwise be too bright to allow observation of those spots around it.", "The data from an X-ray diffraction experiment is fed into a program that can mathematically deconvolute why the spots showed up where they did. The process has been compared to throwing a stone over your shoulder into a pond, then watching the ripples to decide where the stone must be. With one stone, that should be pretty easy. You would find the stone at the center of a circle of ripples. With two or more stones, interference patterns make the ripples more complex, and so it may take more work to determine where each stone lies in the pond.", "The picture below illustrates the results of a relatively simple X-ray diffraction experiment commonly used with crystalline polymer samples. The technique is called wide-angle X-ray scattering, or WAXS. It simply reports the angle at which scattering intensity is observed relative to the initial X-ray beam. That angle corresponds to a distance between atoms in the sample, which in this case usually corresponds to a distance between parallel polymer chains. Sometimes there can be more than one peak, but this example is a simple one to start with.", "The relationship between this scattering angle and an interatomic distance is given by Bragg's Law, a fundamental starting point in X-ray crystallography first expressed by Sir William Bragg and his son, Sir Lawrence Bragg. The law states that:", "n\u03bb=2dsin\u03b8\n(3.5.1)\n(3.5.1)n\u03bb=2dsin\u2061\u03b8", "in which n is an integer (typically assumed to be 1), lambda is the wavelength of the X-ray used (commonly 1.541 \u00c5, although others are possible), d is the distance between regularly repeating atoms and \u03b8 is the scattering angle.", "Rearranging Equation\n3.5.1\n3.5.1\n, we find:", "\\\nd=\n1.541\n2sin\u03b8\n(3.5.2)\n(3.5.2)d=1.5412sin\u2061\u03b8", "In other words, the distance between atoms is inversely proportional to the scattering angle. The greater the angle, the smaller the distance.", "EXAMPLE\n3.5.1\n3.5.", "In each of the following cases, determine which sample (A or B) has a higher crystalline content.", "Crystalline domains provide additional strength to polymer materials. The strong attraction possible between closely-aligned chains results in long segments of the polymer being held more firmly in position. Consequently, chain flow is more limited, and the material becomes more rigid.", "Sometimes, more rigid segments of a polymer are deliberately built into the structure. For example, in block co-polymers, softer, more flexible blocks are often paired with harder, more rigid blocks. The soft segments may have greater conformational flexibility, or weaker intermolecular attractions between themselves, or both. The hard segments may be more conformationally rigid or they may have stronger intermolecular attractions, such as strong dipoles or hydrogen bonds.", "If the block lengths are the right size, the two segments are able to separate into two phases. As a result of stronger intermolecular attractions, lengths of chains containing hard segments cluster together, pushing out the soft segments that would otherwise get in the way of these intermolecular attractions. This phenomenon is called microphase separation. The result is that the material contains islands of strength and rigidity in a matrix of flexible polymer chains. That can be a very useful combination. The flexible chains of the soft segments allow the polymer to be distorted, bent or compressed, but the hard segments put limits on that flexibility, keeping the material firmly together.", "Because we are usually dealing with very large numbers of enchained monomers, the difference between the two kinds of segments need not even be dramatic. A copolymer of butadiene and styrene, both hydrocarbons, can form microphase separated materials. In this case, intermolecular attractions are dominated by weak London dispersion forces, but the aromatic groups of the styrene, with their delocalized pi systems, have London dispersion forces that are slightly stronger. As a result, the polystyrene blocks can cluster together, surrounded by the softer polybutadiene blocks.", "Problem PP6.1.", "Identify the hard segment and the soft segment in each of the following block-co-polymers.", "Sometimes, the separation between these phases can be directly observed via microscopy. Tunneling electron microscopy (TEM) is a technique that can generate images of a cross-sectional slice of the material. The material is generally stained with a heavy metal, such as osmium, that binds preferentially to one phase or the other. The stained phase shows up darker under TEM than the phase that isn't stained.", "X-ray diffraction techniques can often be used to measure distances between hard segments. Small-angle X-ray scattering (SAXS) is very similar to wide-angle X-ray scattering (WAXS). Because of the inverse relationship between scattering angle and distance, SAXS is used to probe regularly repeating structures at greater distances than those seen in WAXS. That makes it possible to see peaks if the hard segments are distributed regularly enough within the soft matrix.", "Note that, in SAXS, the x-axis is usually labeled as q, the scattering vector:", "q = 4\u03c0sin\u03b8 / \u03bb", "But since d = 2sin\u03b8/\u03bb then q = 2\u03c0/d or d = 2\u03c0/q. That gives us a pretty straightforward way of calculating distances between regularly-spaced hard segments (or any other regularly-spaced objects). Once again, just as in WAXS, there is an inverse relationship between the quantity shown on the x-axis and distances through space.", "Problem PP6.2.", "Calculate the approximate distances revealed in the following SAXS results.", "If you think about materials made from polymers, a couple of things might readily come to mind. You might think about the ubiquitous use of plastics in structures around us, such as automobile bumpers. You might think about a rubber band that you use to fasten something more firmly, either at home or in the lab. In either case, the function of the material relies on its response to stimuli. Do we want it to be flexible, to change shape, but then snap back to where it came from? Exactly how much flexibility do we need? Where is the trade-off between flexibility and strength?", "These questions are important in polymer chemistry. Consequently, we often need to probe how materials behave under different conditions so that we know how they can be employed most effectively.", "Tensile testing is one of the simplest ways to probe how a material responds to stress. Remember, the stress in this context means the force exerted on the material per unit of cross-sectional area. As such, it has units of pressure, such as Pascals (Pa). To do the experiment, the two ends of a sample are attached to two clamps, one of which is movable. The movable clamp is then pulled so that the sample becomes stretched. The force required to pull the sample is recorded and, given the cross-sectional area of the sample perpendicular to the force, the force is converted into units of strain.", "The experiment also measures the distance that the sample is stretched (the strain). That distance is usually expressed as a ratio, comparing the change in length to the original length of the sample. It can be written either as a fraction or as a percent.", "In the rough sketch below, we can see what typically happens in such an experiment. The sample stretches (the strain increases), and it gets harder to stretch as seen by the increasing force (and therefore increasing stress) that is needed to keep stretching it. Eventually, the stress plummets, because of the sample breaks.", "Already in this graph, we can see a couple of important pieces of information we can learn from tensile testing. Number one, how far can we stretch this material before it breaks? That quantity is called \"strain at break\". In this sample the strain at break looks like about 1.1 or 110%; that means the sample was stretched to twice its original length, and then some. Number two, how much stress can the sample support without breaking? That quantity is called \"ultimate tensile strength\". In this sample, the ultimate tensile strength is just over 750 Pa.", "If we look more closely at the graph from another sample, we will get a third important quantity, and see some additional features. The important quantity can be derived from the first part of the curve (A), in which stress increases linearly with strain. In this linear region, the material is behaving as a \"Hookean solid\", meaning it obeys Hooke's Law. Hooke's Law says that stress and strain should be directly proportional. In his original words, the extension is proportional to the force:", "F = kx", "in which F is the force, x is the extension of the solid, and k is the proportionality constant.", "Hooke's Law is commonly applied to the behavior of mechanical springs, but it also holds for other solid materials. The slope in the linear region of the graph (A) would equal that proportionality constant, k, because the graph shows the ratio of F/x. In materials science, this slope is more commonly called \"Young's modulus\". It is a measure of the inherent stiffness of the material.", "Young's modulus: E = \u03c3/\u03b5", "in which \u03c3 = stress and \u03b5 = extensional strain.", "The extensional strain is just the strain observed by stretching the material. In the graph shown above, Young's modulus is around:", "250 Pa / 0.1 = 2,500 Pa.", "This initial region of the curve, in which Hooke's Law is obeyed, is sometimes called the \"linear elastic region\". The word \"elastic\" does have an immediate connotation in everyday English, bringing to mind a rubber band that can be stretched, so we think of the stretching part when we hear the word \"elastic\". However, the returning motion is an essential feature of elastic behavior. The rubber band always comes back to its original shape. Likewise, within the linear elastic region, any solid material returns to its original shape after it is deformed under stress.", "With most solids, such as aluminum or concrete, the linear elastic region spans a very narrow range of strains. Just by looking, we wouldn't notice these materials being deformed. However, this linear stress-strain relationship is typical of solids. In rheology, that behavior is described as elastic. Of course, with many polymers, a sample can be stretched so far that you can see the change with the naked eye, and it still returns to that original shape.", "What makes polymers different? The long-chain structure of polymers does make them behave differently from other materials. These chains can undergo conformational change: each bond along the chain can rotate, converting the polymer chain into a slightly different shape. That ability gives a \"soft material\" a great deal of flexibility. The conformations of chains can adapt to accommodate stress, moving the chains into new shapes that offer lower-energy packing between each other. When the stress is removed, the chains eventually slide back into their original conformations. They return to their equilibrium shapes.", "The presence of physical or chemical crosslinks help the material return to its original shape, functioning as anchor points so that the chains don't stray too far. Those interactions might be found in hard-phase interactions in a microphase separated material, as illustrated here, although they could also be found in a homogeneous material.", "The linear elastic region isn't all we see in the stress-strain curve above. At point (B), the linear relationship is suddenly lost. The stress might even drop, as seen in this particular case. This feature on the graph is called the \"yield point\". The stress being experienced by the material, and the resulting strain, has become sufficient to overcome the natural elastic behavior of the solid. As noted previously, physical crosslinks such as hydrogen bonds help to reinforce the elastic behavior of a polymer sample. If, at some point, those interactions are overcome, the chains will start to slide more readily past each other.", "As a result, the material loses its elasticity. When the stress is released, the material will still spring back as the chains settle into a new conformational equilibrium. However, that equilibrium will not be the same as the one before. New physical crosslinks will form as groups form intermolecular interactions with the nearest neighbors they encounter. It isn't likely that these will always be the same groups that they were interacting with before. As a result, the material will settle into a slightly different shape. You have probably seen this happen before when a rubber band has been stretched too far, too often, or for too long. Chains have dropped their old interactions and picked up new ones that formed more easily in the extended shape.", "At point (C) of the example graph, the slope of the curve starts to increase. The same change in stress results in smaller and smaller changes in strain; the material is getting stiffer. This phenomenon is called \"strain hardening\". This feature would not always be observed, but if it did happen, what would explain it? In polymers, one explanation may lay in the fact that the volume of the material should remain constant as it is stretched. If the sample is getting longer, that means it is also getting narrower.", "As a consequence of that narrowing cross-section, chains become compressed together. At some point, physical crosslinks begin occurring between neighboring chains. These crosslinks don't occur in equilibrium positions, with polymer chains coiled around each other like they were in the original sample. These crosslinks occur when chains are extended, lying parallel to each other, at closer contact distances than normal.", "We can see the opposite sort of thing happening at (D), when the slope of the curve is decreasing instead of increasing. This phenomenon is called \"strain-softening\". Again, it might not be observed in all samples. When it does happen, what causes it? In this case, the answer is simpler. Having overcome the interactions that held the chains together, there is nothing left to resist further deformation. As the chains begin to disentangle from each other, it becomes even easier to pull them apart, facilitating the extension or stretching of the sample.", "Eventually, at the breaking point (E), the chains start to lose contact with each other at some location in the sample, resulting in a catastrophic rupture of the sample.", "Problem PP7.1.", "In each of the following curves, estimate ultimate tensile strength and strain at break.", "Problem PP7.2.", "In each of the following curves, calculate Young's modulus.", "Problem PP7.3.", "In each of the following curves, identify any diagnostic features.", "We saw earlier that the inherent stiffness of a material can be assessed by its Young's modulus. The Young's modulus is the ratio of the stress-induced in a material under an applied strain. The stress is the amount of deformation in the material, such as the change in length in an extensional experiment, expressed as a fraction of the beginning length. The strain is the force exerted on the sample divided by the cross-sectional area of the sample. If the strain is limited to a very small deformation, then it varies linearly with stress. If we graph the relationship, then the slope of the line gives us Young's modulus, E. That's the proportionality constant between stress and strain in Hooke's Law.", "E = \u03c3 / \u03b5", "Hooke's Law is sometimes used to describe the behavior of mechanical springs. The modulus can be thought of the resistance to stretching a spring; the more resistance the spring offers, the greater the force needed to stretch it. The same force is what snaps the spring back into place once you let it go.", "In the experiments we saw earlier, we didn't let go. We continued to stretch the material farther and farther, applying generally increasing stress until the material finally broke. Now we will look at a much more limited approach. Instead of stretching the material as far as we can, we will only stretch it a tiny bit, then release the stress so that it snaps back to its original length. We can then stress it again and release it again. We can keep repeating. Instead of a continuously increasing strain, this sample is subjected to an oscillatory strain, one that repeats in a cycle.", "This approach is called dynamic mechanical analysis. We can use dynamic mechanical analysis to measure the modulus of the material. Instead of continuously moving all the way through the linear elastic region, beyond which Hooke's law breaks down, we carefully keep the sample in the Hookean region for the entire experiment. Now, one experiment should be good enough to extract the modulus, but we are letting go and doing it over again. Why?", "The principle reason for running the experiment this way is to get some additional information. We can get this information because polymers don't quite follow Hooke's Law perfectly. In reality, even within the linear elastic region, the stress-strain curve is not quite linear. In the picture below, the curvature is exaggerated quite a bit, just for illustrative purposes.", "Even if the relationship is not quite linear, then as we release the strain, the stress in the material should simply follow the curve back down to zero. It does not. Instead, there is a phenomenon called hysteresis at work. Hysteresis just means that a property of the material depends on how the material came to be in its current situation. In this case, Hooke's Law seems to imply that a specific sample subjected to a specific strain would experience a specific stress (or vice versa). However, it depends whether we are stretching the sample or letting it relax again. As we let the sample relax back to its initial length, the strain is different from what we saw when we were stretching it. Typically, it's lower. Again, we can see this in the curve below, where the curvature has been exaggerated.", "The difference between the loading curve (when the stress was first applied) and the unloading curve (when the stress was removed) represents an energy loss. A force was applied to move a sample or a portion of a sample, some distance. When the sample snapped back the same distance, the force was unequal to the one that was initially applied. Some energy was therefore lost.", "The slope of the loading curve, analogous to Young's modulus in a tensile testing experiment, is called the storage modulus, E'. The storage modulus is a measure of how much energy must be put into the sample in order to distort it. The difference between the loading and unloading curves is called the loss modulus, E\". It measures energy lost during that cycling strain.", "Why would energy be lost in this experiment? In a polymer, it has to do chiefly with chain flow. The resistance to deformation in a polymer comes from entanglement, including both physical crosslinks and more general occlusions as chains encounter each other while undergoing conformational changes to accommodate the new shape of the material. Once the stress is removed, the material springs back to its equilibrium shape, but there is no reason chains would have to follow the exact same conformational pathway to return to their equilibrium conformations. Because they have moved out of their original positions, they are able to follow a lower-energy pathway back to their starting point, a pathway in which there is less resistance between neighboring chains.", "For that reason, stretching a polymer is not quite the same as stretching a mechanical spring. A \"spring-and-dashpot\" analogy is often invoked to describe soft materials. Whereas a spring simply bounces back to its original shape after being pulled, a dashpot does not. If you don't know what a dashpot is, picture the hydraulic arms that support the hatchback on a car when you open it upward. There is some resistance to opening the hatchback because a piston is being pulled through a hydraulic fluid as the arm stretches. When we stop lifting, the arms stay at that length, because the hydraulic fluid also resists the movement of the piston back to its original position. The dashpot has a tendency to stay put rather than spring back.", "Polymers display a little of both properties. They have an elastic element, rooted in entanglement, that makes them resist deformation and return to their original shapes. They also have a viscous element, rooted in chain flow. That viscous element means that, when we distort polymeric materials, they might not return to exactly the same form as when they started out. Taken together, these behaviors are described as viscoelastic properties. Many materials have viscoelastic properties, meaning they display some aspects of elastic solids and some aspects of viscous liquids.", "So far, we have concentrated on extensional deformations of materials: we have been looking at what happens when we stretch them. It's worth looking at another type of deformation because it is very commonly used in materials testing. This second approach uses shear instead of an extension to probe how the material will respond. A shear force is applied unevenly to a material so that it tilts or twists rather than stretching.", "One of the reasons this approach is used so often is because it is very easy to do. A sample is sandwiched between two plates. The bottom plate is held in place while the top plate is twisted, shearing the material held in between.", "If we take a closer look at a layer of the sample, maybe at the surface, along the edge of the sandwich, we can imagine breaking it down into individual layers. Under shear strain, those layers move different amounts. The top layer, right beneath that top plate moves the most. The bottom layer, sitting on the stationary lower plate, doesn't move at all. In between, each layer moves a little further than the one beneath it. This gradation of deformation across the sample is very much like what we saw in the analysis of the viscosity of liquids. The difference is that viscosity looks at the variation of strain with time. Nevertheless, modulus in solids is roughly analogous to viscosity in liquids.", "We can use this parallel plate geometry to obtain values for storage modulus and loss modulus, just like we can via an extensional geometry. The values we get are not quite the same. For this reason, modulus obtained from shear experiments is given a different symbol than modulus obtained from extensional experiments. In a shear experiment,", "G = \u03c3 / \u03b5", "That means storage modulus is given the symbol G' and loss modulus is given the symbol G\". Apart from providing a little more information about how the experiment was actually conducted, this distinction between shear modulus and extension modulus is important because the resulting values are quite different. In general, the value of the storage modulus obtained from an extensional experiment is about three times larger than the value of storage modulus obtained from a shear experiment.", "E' = 3 G'", "The reason for the difference is that extension actually involves deformation of the material in three directions. As the material is stretched in one direction (let's say it's the y-direction), in order to preserve the constant volume of the material (there is still the same amount of stuff before and after stretching), the material compresses in both the other two directions (x and z).", "Problem PP8.1.", "Metric prefixes are frequently encountered when reading about modulus. Rank the following units of stress from smallest to largest, and in each case provide a conversion factor to Pa.", "GPa kPa MPa Pa", "The storage modulus measures the resistance to deformation in an elastic solid. It's related to the proportionality constant between stress and strain in Hooke's Law, which states that extension increases with force. In the dynamic mechanical analysis, we look at the stress (\u03c3), which is the force per cross-sectional unit area, needed to cause an extension in the sample, or the strain (\u03b5).", "E = \u03c3 / \u03b5", "Alternatively, in a shear experiment:", "G = \u03c3 / \u03b5", "The dynamic mechanical analysis differs from simple tensile testing by performing the experiment cyclically. The sample is stretched and released (or sheared and released). It can then be subjected to additional stress and released again. There is an element of time involved here. Specifically, because the experiment is cyclic, it can be carried out at different frequencies. When you do that, and you plot the resulting modulus against frequency, you can get additional information about the sample. The results would typically be presented in a graph like this one:", "What the graph tells us is that frequency clearly matters. When the experiment is run at higher frequencies, the storage modulus is higher. The material appears to be stiffer. In contrast, the loss modulus is lower at those high frequencies; the material behaves much less like a viscous liquid. In particular, the sharp drop in loss modulus is related to the relaxation time of the material. In this context, that's the time it takes the chains to flow into new conformations in response to the applied stress. If they don't have time to flow, then that viscous response of the material is lost. The material behaves much more like an elastic solid when subjected to high-frequency cyclic deformation. That's important to know, because a material might be subjected to vibrations or other stimuli during everyday use, and its properties might change accordingly.", "Another variation on this kind of experiment is called dynamic mechanical thermal analysis. Instead of changing the frequency of the stimulus throughout the experiment, the frequency is held constant and the temperature is changed instead. As a result, we can again see how the material responds under different conditions, which might tell us how it will behave in everyday applications. The result of the experiment might be a graph like the one below:", "At this point, you are already familiar with the glass transition. It shouldn't be surprising that the properties are dependent on temperature. At the glass transition temperature, the expanding volume of the material with increasing temperature becomes sufficient to allow chain flow. As a result, the material suddenly behaves much more like a viscous liquid. Loss modulus increases. The stiffness of the material drops as the entangled chains not longer resist deformation as strongly. Storage modulus decreases.", "The dynamic mechanical thermal analysis thus provides an alternative way to determine the glass transition temperature. Because it is actually measuring a different physical phenomenon than differential scanning calorimetry, the Tg obtained from a DMTA experiment may not agree exactly with one obtained from a DSC experiment. Nevertheless, it is often useful to have different ways of assessing properties.", "In order to facilitate the analysis of the Tg in this experiment, a different quantity is usually displayed. Tan delta is just the ratio of the loss modulus to the storage modulus. It peaks at the glass transition temperature.", "The term \"tan delta\" refers to a mathematical treatment of storage modulus; it's what happens in-phase with (or at the same time as) the application of stress, whereas loss modulus happens out-of-phase with the application of stress. Because it would take some time for the chains to move into new confirmation when they are subjected to stress, the strain actually lags behind the stress in these experiments.", "Delta refers to the phase lag, the amount of time between application of stress and the observation of maximum strain. You may remember that a sine curve and cosine curve are out of phase with each other. Storage modulus is described as being proportional to cos\u03b4 whereas loss modulus is proportional to sin\u03b4. The ratio of cos\u03b4 to sin\u03b4 is just tan\u03b4.", "Why does tan\u03b4 peak at the glass transition temperature? Clearly, as chains begin to move more freely, loss modulus increases. Consequently, the material also becomes less stiff and more rubbery. The storage modulus drops. If tan delta is the ratio of loss modulus to storage modulus, it should increase at that point -- and it does. Why does it drop again? That's because loss modulus refers to an energy loss, but because the material has gotten softer, less stress (and less energy) is put into the sample in the first place, so the energy loss also gets smaller. As a result, tan delta goes up at the glass transition but drops again shortly beyond that point.", "Problem PP9.1.", "Estimate the storage and loss, modulus in the glassy phase and rubbery phase in each of the following cases.", "Problem PP9.2.", "Estimate Tg in each of the following cases.", "Problem PP1.1.", "a) With a shorter elution time, I has a higher molecular weight than II. The narrower peak means that I has a narrower dispersity than II.", "b) With a shorter elution time, III has a higher molecular weight than IV. The wider peak means that III has a broader dispersity than IV.", "c) With a higher elution time, V has a lower molecular weight than VI. The wider peak means that V has a broader dispersity than VI.", "Problem PP1.2.", "a) repeat unit: 109 x (C4H6O2) = 109 x 86.09 g/mol = 9,383.81 g/mol", "end groups: C9H11 + Br = 119.19 + 79.9 = 199.09 g/mol", "total: 9,383.81 + 199.09 = 9,582.90 g/mol", "b) repeat unit: 763 x (C8H8) = 763 x 104.15 g/mol = 79,466.45 g/mol", "end groups: C4H9 + H = 57.12 + 1.008 = 58.13 g/mol", "total: 79,466.45 + 58.13 = 79,524.58 g/mol", "c) repeat unit: 48 x (C4H6O2) = 48 x 86.09 g/mol = 4,132.32 g/mol", "end groups: C4H9 + C7H5S2 = 57.12 + 153.26 = 210.38 g/mol", "total: 4,132.32 + 210.38 = 4,342.70 g/mol", "Problem PP1.3.", "The ratio of the repeat unit integral per proton to the end group proton per integral gives the degree of polymerization. We could take the entire integration of the end group and divide it by the entire number of protons in that group, or select one position to represent the end group. Similarly, we can select one position to represent the repeat unit.", "a) repeat unit integral per proton = 36.0 / 2H = 18", "end group integral per proton = 0.32 / 2H = 0.16", "degree of polymerization = 18/0.16 = 112", "b) repeat unit integral per proton = 26.0 / 1H = 26", "end group integral per proton = 1.32 / 9H = 0.15", "degree of polymerization = 26/0.15 = 173", "c) repeat unit integral per proton = 54.0 / 4H = 13.5", "end group integral per proton = 0.49 / 1H = 0.49", "degree of polymerization = 13.5/0.49 = 28", "Problem PP2.1.", "\u03b1 is the slope, which is [rise]/[run]. That's approximately [4.0-2.4]/[6.6-4.4] = 1.6/2.2 = 0.73.", "K is the y-intercept. The equation for a straight line is y = mx +b; in this case, y = 0.73x + b. If we choose a point on the line, such as (x,y) = (4.9, 2.0), we can substitute those values on for x and y to get b.", "So 2.0 = 0.73(4.9) + b, or b = 2.0 - 3.56 = -1.56.", "Problem PP2.2.", "If the molecular weight is a million g/mol, then log(Mw) = 6. Interpolating, log([\u03b7]) = 4, or [\u03b7] = 10,000 ml/g.", "Problem PP2.3.", "If the intrinsic viscosity, [\u03b7] = 800 ml/g, then log([\u03b7]) = 2.9. Interpolating, log(Mw) = 5.1, or Mw = 126,000 g/mol.", "Problem PP2.4.", "Ethylene glycol can form hydrogen bonds at either end of the molecule, forming a supramolecular assembly much like a polymer. As a result, it has a much greater drag in solution, higher viscosity.", "Problem PP3.1.", "Honey is a concentrated solution of simple sugars, which are small molecules. Molasses, although similar to honey in some ways, also contain starches, which are polymers. This polymeric content leads to shear-thinning behavior.", "Problem PP4.1.", "a) There is a glass transition at around -18\u00b0C.", "b) There is a melting point at around 125\u00b0C.", "c) There is a glass transition at around -4\u00b0C.", "d) There is a glass transition at around 117\u00b0C and a melting point at around 146\u00b0C.", "Problem PP5.1.", "a) Tg is observed at around 78\u00b0C, Tm is observed at around 117\u00b0C and Tc is observed at around 104\u00b0C.", "b) Tg is observed at around 134\u00b0C and Tm is observed at around 167\u00b0C, but Tc is not observed; the sample failed to crystallize, but remained an amorphous solid.", "c) Tm is observed at around 194\u00b0C and Tc is observed at around 187\u00b0C. Tg is not observed, and probably occurs below 150\u00b0C", "d) Tg is observed at around 123\u00b0C, but Tm is not observed. The experiment checked much higher than Tg (over a hundred degrees), so the material may be an amorphous solid.", "Problem PP6.1.", "Problem PP6.2.", "a) d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.40 = 16 \u00c5; d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.70 = 9.0 \u00c5", "b) d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.25 = 25 \u00c5; d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.85 = 7.4 \u00c5", "c) d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.25 = 25 \u00c5; d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.52 = 12 \u00c5; d = (2 x 3.14) / 0.66 = 10 \u00c5", "Problem PP7.1.", "a) ultimate tensile strength = 800 Pa; strain at break = 55%", "b) ultimate tensile strength = 750 Pa; strain at break = 215%", "c) ultimate tensile strength = 220 Pa; strain at break = 120%", "Problem PP7.2.", "a) E = \u03c3 / \u03b5 = 180 Pa / 0.30 = 600 Pa", "b) E = \u03c3 / \u03b5 = 450 Pa / 0.15 = 3,000 Pa", "c) E = \u03c3 / \u03b5 = 50 Pa / 0.25 = 200 Pa", "d) E = \u03c3 / \u03b5 = 75 Pa / 0.30 = 250 Pa", "Problem PP7.3.", "Problem PP8.1.", "1 Pa = 1 Pa", "1 kPa = 1,000 Pa", "1 MPa = 1,000,000 Pa", "1GPa = 1,000,000,000 Pa", "Problem PP9.1.", "a) glassy: storage modulus = 15 MPa; loss modulus = 70 kPa", "rubbery: storage modulus = 7 MPa; loss modulus = 80 kPa", "b) glassy: storage modulus = 600 kPa; loss modulus = 140 kPa", "rubbery: storage modulus = 130 kPa; loss modulus = 150 kPa", "c) glassy: storage modulus = 320 kPa; loss modulus = 80 kPa", "rubbery: storage modulus = 70 kPa; loss modulus = 70 kPa", "Problem PP9.2.", "a) 89 \u00b0C", "b) 170 \u00b0C", "c) 124 \u00b0C"]